West Virginia, session 2026, HB4945.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2E. High Quality Educational Programs. §18-2E-3g. No electronic devices shall be used in classrooms for students grade three and below. There shall be no use of individual electronic devices such as laptops, computers, tablets, etc. for learning and testing in classrooms for students in grade three and below excluding calculators.